Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2734.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-20 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-20. Disclosure.
(a) A landlord or any person authorized to enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf
shall disclose to the tenant in writing, at or before the commencement of the tenancy, the name,
address and number of:
(1) The person authorized to manage the premises; and
(2) An owner of the premises or a person authorized to act for and on behalf of the owner
for the purpose of service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands.
(b) The information required to be furnished by this section shall be kept current. This
section extends to and is enforceable against any successor landlord, owner, or manager.
(c) A person who fails to comply with subsection (a) of this section becomes an agent of
each person who is a landlord for:
(1) Service of process and receiving and receipting for notices and demands; and
(2) Performing the obligations of the landlord under this chapter and under the rental
agreement and expending or making available for the purpose of all rent collected from the
premises.
(d) A landlord who becomes delinquent on a mortgage securing real estate upon which the
dwelling unit is located for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days shall notify the tenant that

the property may be subject to foreclosure; and until the foreclosure occurs the tenant must continue
to pay rent to the landlord as provided under the rental agreement.
(e)(1) For any dwelling unit that constitutes shoreline property as defined in § 5-20.8-1, the
landlord shall provide the tenant, prior to the commencement of the tenancy, with a written
shoreline access disclosure, which shall include the following information:
(i) Shoreline Access – Members of the public shall have the right to access shoreline
property as defined in § 5-20.8-1. The public’s rights and privileges of the shore may be exercised,
where shore exists, on wet sand or dry sand or rocky beach, up to ten feet (10') landward of the
recognizable high tide line, subject to the restrictions governed by § 46-23-26 and any general laws
to the contrary;
(ii) The landlord is required to notify the tenant of any public rights-of-way on the real
estate that are known to the landlord. Upon request, the landlord shall provide the tenant with a
copy of any documentation evidencing such rights-of-way or conditions of public access that is in
the landlord’s possession; and
(iii) The tenant is advised to contact the coastal resources management council, the
municipality, or applicable nonprofit organizations to determine whether any public rights-of-way
exist.
(2) The disclosure required by this subsection may be satisfied by incorporating it into any
written rental agreement or provided in a separate written notice delivered to the tenant in the
manner prescribed for delivery of written notices pursuant to § 34-18-14.
SECTION 2. Section 42-63.1-14 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-63.1 entitled "Tourism
and Development" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-63.1-14. Offering residential units through a hosting platform.
(a) For any rental property offered for tourist or transient use on a hosting platform that
collects and remits applicable sales and hotel taxes in compliance with §§ 44-18-7.3(b)(4)(i), 44-
18-18, and 44-18-36.1, cities, towns, or municipalities shall not prohibit the owner from offering
the unit for tourist or transient use through such hosting platform, or prohibit such hosting platform
from providing a person or entity the means to rent, pay for, or otherwise reserve a residential unit
for tourist or transient use. A hosting platform shall comply with the requirement imposed upon
room resellers in §§ 44-18-7.3(b)(4)(i) and 44-18-36.1 in order for the prohibition of this section to
apply. The division of taxation shall at the request of a city, town, or municipality confirm whether
a hosting platform is registered in compliance with § 44-18-7.3(b)(4)(i).
(b) Any short-term rental property listed for rent on the website of any third-party hosting
platform that conducts business in Rhode Island shall be registered with the department of business
LC004471/SUB B - Page 2 of 6

regulation. The registration shall provide the information necessary to identify the property
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. For purposes of this section, the term “short-term rental”
means a person, firm, or corporation’s utilization, for transient lodging accommodations, not to
exceed thirty (30) nights at a time.
(c) The department of business regulation shall contact all hosting platforms that list
property in Rhode Island on their website for rent and that submit hotel taxes to the division of
taxation and/or the city of Newport and shall provide notice of the registration requirement,
pursuant to this section, instructing the hosting platforms to notify their listed properties to register
with the department of business regulation annually or be subject to fines pursuant to subsection (i)
of this section. Provided further, renewals of registrations pursuant to this section shall become due
for renewal on the anniversary date of the original registration.
(d) The state registration pursuant to this section shall include:
(1) The principal place of business of the owner, or if outside the state, the agent for service
of process or property manager for the owner;
(2) The phone number of the owner of the property and/or property manager;
(3) The email address of the property owner and/or property manager;
(4) The address of the rental property;
(5) The number of rooms for rent at the property;
(6) Whether the registrant rents or owns; and
(7) Intended use (entire space, private room, or shared space).
(e) The assigned registration number shall consist of numeric and alpha characters, the
alpha characters shall correspond to the city/town where the property is located and shall be uniform
for the remaining properties in said city/town.
(f) Registration forms and/or any registration materials required by the department shall be
completed prior to a listing by a hosting platform. The registration number shall be valid for the
year during which it is assigned, and if a listed property is not duly registered after the expiration
of the annual registration period, the hosting platform shall remove the property listing from its
website within fourteen (14) days of notification from the department.
(g) The department of business regulation shall promulgate rules and regulations to
correspond with and enforce this section and § 42-63.1-14.1 and may charge a registration fee to
property owners registering with the department pursuant to this section.
(h) The department of business regulation shall create an online database to store all
registered short-term rental units, and each unit shall have an online identification number in said
database to correspond with subsection (e) of this section.
LC004471/SUB B - Page 3 of 6

(i) Any owner of the property who or that fails to register with the department of business
regulation as prescribed herein and lists the property as a short-term rental on a hosting platform
website shall be subject to a civil fine as follows:
(1) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first thirty (30) days of noncompliance;
(2) Five hundred dollars ($500) for between thirty-one (31) and sixty (60) days of
noncompliance; and
(3) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for more than sixty (60) days of noncompliance.
(j) Notwithstanding any other law or provision to the contrary, no person shall list any
residence for short-term rental for tourist or transient use without the property’s current, valid
registration number, and its expiration date, which hosting platforms shall require to be displayed
on the listing advertisement. Any hosting platform that offers short-term rental of residential
property for tourist or transient use without requiring the owner to display the current, valid
registration number of a property, and its expiration date, shall be subject to a civil fine of two
hundred fifty dollars ($250) per day per violation, with each property listing constituting a separate
violation.
(k) A hosting platform shall provide to the department of business regulation, on a quarterly
basis, an electronic report, in a format determined by the department of business regulation, of the
listings maintained, authorized, facilitated, or advertised by the hosting platform within the state
for the applicable reporting period. The report shall include a breakdown of the municipality where
the listings are located, whether the listing is for a room or a whole unit, the total number of short-
term rentals listed on the platform, the registration number of each short-term rental listed on the
platform, the URL link of each short-term rental listed on the platform, and shall include the number
of nights each unit was reported as occupied during the applicable reporting period.
(l)(1) For any dwelling unit that constitutes shoreline property as defined in § 5-20.8-1, the
owner shall provide the occupant, prior to the commencement of the short-term rental, with a
shoreline access disclosure, which shall include the following information:
"Shoreline Access – Members of the public shall have the right to access shoreline property
as defined in § 5-20.8-1. The public’s rights and privileges of the shore may be exercised, where
shore exists, on wet sand or dry sand or rocky beach, up to ten feet (10') landward of the
recognizable high tide line, subject to the restrictions governed by § 46-23-26 and any general laws
to the contrary."
(2) The disclosure required by subsection (l)(1) of this section may be made by:
(i) Including the disclosure in the listing on a hosting platform, provided that the listing
clearly and conspicuously displays the disclosure before the booking is completed; or
LC004471/SUB B - Page 4 of 6

(ii) Incorporating the disclosure into a written rental agreement or providing it in a separate
written notice delivered to the occupant prior to the commencement of the rental in the manner
prescribed for delivery of written notices pursuant to § 34-18-14.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC004471/SUB B
========
LC004471/SUB B - Page 5 of 6